District of Columbia statutes.
1-15-31

I. PURPOSE

The purpose of this reorganization plan is to consolidate into one agency, the operation and administration of the child support enforcement program pursuant to Pub. L. 93-647 (“Title IV-D” of the Social Security Act), Pub. L. 98-378 and Pub. L. 100-485, and District of Columbia law relating to the establishment of paternity and support and the enforcement of support obligations. Under this Reorganization Plan, the Office of Corporation Counsel which performs the legal functions related to the child support program, will, upon the effective date of this Reorganization Plan, directly administer the District’s Title IV-D Program previously performed by the Department of Human Services.

II. TRANSFER OF FUNCTIONS

All functions of the Office of Paternity and Child Support Enforcement, within the Department of Human Services, are hereby transferred to the Office of the Corporation Counsel.

III. ESTABLISHMENT

(a)

There is hereby established in the Office of the Corporation Counsel a new Child Support Division which shall be comprised of the current Child Support Section (within the OCC Family Services Division) and the Office of Paternity and Child Support Enforcement, Department of Human Services.

(b)

The Office of Corporation Counsel:

(1)

shall be the state agency for purposes of applying for and receiving federal funds for the operations of the Title IV-D program relating to the establishment of paternity and support and the enforcement of support obligations. Toward that end, the Office shall take all steps necessary for the submission and approval of the District of Columbia State Plan under the Title IV-D and any plan amendments.

(2)

shall be responsible for representing the interest of the District in all legal matters relative to establishing and enforcing support orders in all Title IV-D cases; and

(3)

shall coordinate and enter into such cooperative agreements as necessary with other District government agencies engaged in child support enforcement activities, including, but not limited to, the Department of Human Services, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the Department of Revenue, the Department of Health, the Metropolitan Police Department, and the Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board.

IV. OTHER TRANSFERS

All positions, personnel, property, records, equipment, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available, or to be made available, that relate primarily to the functions set forth in Part II above are hereby transferred to the Office of the Corporation Counsel.

V. REALIGNMENT FOLLOWING REORGANIZATION

The Corporation Counsel, in the performance of duties and functions transferred by this Reorganization Plan, is authorized to establish such organizational components with such specified functions as he/she deems appropriate.

VI. ABOLISHMENT

The Office of Paternity and Child Support Enforcement within the Commission on Social Services, Department of Human Services, is hereby abolished.

VII. EFFECTIVE DATE

This Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1998 in all its parts shall become effective pursuant to the promulgation of an executive order of the Mayor establishing the same after this plan has been approved in accordance with the requirements of Section 422(12) of the Home Rule Act (D.C. Code § 1-242(12) [§ 1-204.22]) and section 161 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, Public Law 105, 100, approved November 19, 1997.